nl: Type voertuiglift: 2-kolomshefbrug; 4-kolomshefbrug; Uitlijnbrug; Ondergrondse hefbrug; Korte-slag-hefbrug; Middelhoge hefbrug; Motorfiets-/ATV-hefbrug; Parkeer-/opslaglift; Mobiele hefbrug; Schaarhefbrug; 1-kolomshefbrug; Overig
sk-SK: Typ zdviháka vozidla: 2-stĺpový zdvihák; 4-stĺpový zdvihák; Zdvihák na geometriu; Zdvihák zapustený do zeme; Nízkozdvižný zdvihák; Stredne zdvižný zdvihák; Zdvihák na motocykle/štvorkolky; Parkovací/skladovací zdvihák; Prenosný zdvihák; Nožnicový zdvihák; 1-stĺpový zdvihák; Iné
de: Art der Fahrzeughebebühne: 2-Säulen-Hebebühne; 4-Säulen-Hebebühne; Achsmess-Hebebühne; Unterflur-Hebebühne; Kurzhub-Hebebühne; Mittelhub-Hebebühne; Motorrad-/ATV-Hebebühne; Park-/Lagerhebebühne; Mobile Hebebühne; Scherenhebebühne; 1-Säulen-Hebebühne; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de elevador de vehículos: Elevador de 2 postes; Elevador de 4 postes; Elevador de alineación; Elevador en el suelo; Elevador de baja altura; Elevador de altura media; Elevador de motocicletas/ATV; Elevador de estacionamiento/almacenamiento; Elevador portátil; Elevador de tijera; Elevador de un solo poste; Otro
it: Tipo di sollevatore del veicolo: Sollevatore a 2 colonne; Sollevatore a 4 colonne; Sollevatore per assetto; Sollevatore interrato; Sollevatore a bassa levata; Sollevatore a media levata; Sollevatore per moto/ATV; Sollevatore per parcheggio/stoccaggio; Sollevatore portatile; Sollevatore a forbice; Sollevatore monocolonna; Altro
pl: Typ podnośnika pojazdu: Podnośnik 2-kolumnowy; Podnośnik 4-kolumnowy; Podnośnik diagnostyczny do geometrii kół; Podnośnik podposadzkowy; Podnośnik niskiego unoszenia; Podnośnik średniego unoszenia; Podnośnik motocyklowy/ATV; Podnośnik parkingowy/magazynowy; Podnośnik przenośny; Podnośnik nożycowy; Podnośnik 1-kolumnowy; Inne
ru: Тип автомобильного подъемника: Двухстоечный подъемник; Четырехстоечный подъемник; Подъемник для сход-развала; Подъемник, встроенный в пол; Подъемник малой высоты; Подъемник средней высоты; Подъемник для мотоциклов/квадроциклов; Подъемник для парковки/хранения; Мобильный подъемник; Ножничный подъемник; Одностоечный подъемник; Другое
sv: Typ av fordonslyft: 2-pelarlyft; 4-pelarlyft; Hjulinställningslyft; Nedsänkt lyft; Låg lyft; Mellanhög lyft; Motorcykel-/ATV-lyft; Parkerings-/förvaringslyft; Bärbar lyft; Saxlyft; 1-pelarlyft; Övrigt
nb: Type løftesystem for kjøretøy: 2-søyler-løftebukk; 4-søyler-løftebukk; Hjulstillingsløftebukk; Nedfelt løftebukk; Lavtløftende løftebukk; Mellomløftende løftebukk; Motorsykkel-/ATV-løftebukk; Parkerings-/lagringsløftebukk; Flyttbar løftebukk; Sakseløfter; 1-søyler-løftebukk; Annet
vi: Loại kích nâng xe: Cầu nâng 2 trụ; Cầu nâng 4 trụ; Cầu nâng cân chỉnh thước lái; Cầu nâng âm sàn; Cầu nâng gầm thấp; Cầu nâng gầm trung; Cầu nâng xe máy/ATV; Cầu nâng đỗ xe/lưu trữ; Cầu nâng di động; Cầu nâng cắt kéo; Cầu nâng 1 trụ; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo do elevador de veículos: Elevador de 2 colunas; Elevador de 4 colunas; Elevador de alinhamento; Elevador embutido no piso; Elevador de elevação baixa; Elevador de elevação média; Elevador para motocicleta/quadriciclo; Elevador de estacionamento/armazenamento; Elevador portátil; Elevador pantográfico; Elevador de 1 coluna; Outro
tr: Araç kaldırma tipi: 2 sütunlu lift; 4 sütunlu lift; Rot ayar lifti; Zemin altı lift; Düşük yükseklikli lift; Orta yükseklikli lift; Motosiklet/ATV lifti; Park/depolama lifti; Taşınabilir lift; Makaslı lift; Tek sütunlu lift; Diğer
fr: Type de pont élévateur: Pont élévateur à 2 colonnes; Pont élévateur à 4 colonnes; Pont élévateur d’alignement; Pont élévateur encastré; Pont élévateur à faible levée; Pont élévateur à levée moyenne; Pont élévateur pour moto/VTT; Pont élévateur de stationnement/stockage; Pont élévateur portable; Pont élévateur à ciseaux; Pont élévateur à 1 colonne; Autre
hu: Járműemelő típusa: Kétoszlopos emelő; Négyoszlopos emelő; Futóműállító emelő; Földbe süllyesztett emelő; Kisemelő; Közepes emelési magasságú emelő; Motorkerékpár-/ATV-emelő; Parkoló-/Tárolóemelő; Hordozható emelő; Ollós emelő; Egyoszlopos emelő; Egyéb
el: Τύπος ανύψωσης οχήματος: Ανυψωτικό 2 κολονών; Ανυψωτικό 4 κολονών; Ανυψωτικό ευθυγράμμισης; Ενδοδαπέδιο ανυψωτικό; Ανυψωτικό χαμηλού ύψους; Ανυψωτικό μεσαίου ύψους; Ανυψωτικό μοτοσικλέτας/ATV; Ανυψωτικό στάθμευσης/αποθήκευσης; Φορητό ανυψωτικό; Ψαλιδωτό ανυψωτικό; Ανυψωτικό 1 κολόνας; Άλλο
ko: 차량용 리프트 유형: 2포스트 리프트; 4포스트 리프트; 얼라인먼트 리프트; 매립형 리프트; 로우라이즈 리프트; 미드라이즈 리프트; 오토바이/ATV 리프트; 주차/보관 리프트; 휴대용 리프트; 시저형 리프트; 1포스트 리프트; 기타
cs: Typ zvedáku vozidla: Dvousloupový zvedák; Čtyřsloupový zvedák; Zvedák na geometrii; Zapuštěný zvedák; Nízkostřižný zvedák; Zvedák se středním zdvihem; Zvedák na motocykly / ATV; Parkovací/skladovací zvedák; Přenosný zvedák; Nůžkový zvedák; Jednosloupový zvedák; Jiné
lt-LT: Transporto priemonių keltuvų tipas: 2 kolonų keltuvas; 4 kolonų keltuvas; Ratų suvedimo keltuvas; Įleidžiamas keltuvas; Žemo pakėlimo keltuvas; Vidutinio pakėlimo keltuvas; Motociklų / keturračių keltuvas; Parkavimo / saugojimo keltuvas; Nešiojamasis keltuvas; Žirklinis keltuvas; Vienos kolonos keltuvas; Kita
ja: 車両リフトタイプ: 2 柱リフト; 4 柱リフト; アライメントリフト; 地中埋め込みリフト; ローライズリフト; ミッドライズリフト; オートバイ/ATVリフト; 駐車/保管用リフト; ポータブルリフト; シザーリフト; 1 柱リフト; その他
th: ประเภทของลิฟต์ยกยานยนต์: ลิฟต์ยกรถ 2 เสา; ลิฟต์ยกรถ 4 เสา; ลิฟต์ตั้งศูนย์; ลิฟต์ยกรถฝังพื้น; ลิฟต์ยกรถระดับต่ำ; ลิฟต์ยกรถระดับกลาง; ลิฟต์ยกมอเตอร์ไซค์/ATV; ลิฟต์จอดรถ/จัดเก็บ; ลิฟต์ยกรถแบบพกพา; ลิฟต์ขากรรไกร; ลิฟต์ยกรถเสาเดียว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип подемник за превозно средство: Двуколонен подемник; Четириколонен подемник; Подемник за реглаж; Вграден подемник; Нископрофилен подемник; Средновисок подемник; Подемник за мотоциклети/ATV; Подемник за паркиране/съхранение; Преносим подемник; Ножичен подемник; Едноколонен подемник; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de elevador de veículos: Elevador de 2 colunas; Elevador de 4 colunas; Elevador de alinhamento; Elevador embutido no solo; Elevador de elevação baixa; Elevador de elevação média; Elevador para moto/ATV; Elevador de estacionamento/armazenamento; Elevador portátil; Elevador de tesoura; Elevador de coluna única; Outro
da: Type af køretøjslift: 2-søjlet lift; 4-søjlet lift; Sporingslift; Nedgravet lift; Lavtløftende lift; Mellemløftende lift; Motorcykel-/ATV-lift; Parkerings-/opbevaringslift; Bærbar lift; Sakselift; 1-søjlet lift; Andet
zh-TW: 車輛升降機類型: 雙柱頂車機; 四柱頂車機; 定位頂車機; 埋地式頂車機; 低揚程頂車機; 中揚程頂車機; 機車/沙灘車頂車機; 停車/儲存頂車機; 便攜式頂車機; 剪式頂車機; 單柱頂車機; 其他
zh-CN: 车辆升降机类型: 双柱举升机; 四柱举升机; 四轮定位举升机; 地埋式举升机; 低位举升机; 中位举升机; 摩托车/ATV 举升机; 停车/仓储举升机; 便携式举升机; 剪式举升机; 单柱举升机; 其他
en: Vehicle lift type: 2-post lift; 4-post lift; Alignment lift; In-ground lift; Low-rise lift; Mid-rise lift; Motorcycle/ATV lift; Parking/storage lift; Portable lift; Scissor lift; Single-post lift; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta dvigala za vozila: Dvostebrno dvigalo; Štiristebrno dvigalo; Dvigalo za optiko koles; Vgradno dvigalo v tla; Nizko dvigalo; Srednje visoko dvigalo; Dvigalo za motorno kolo/štirikolesnik; Dvigalo za parkiranje/shranjevanje; Prenosno dvigalo; Škarjasto dvigalo; Enostebrno dvigalo; Drugo
fi: Ajoneuvonostimen tyyppi: 2-pilarinostin; 4-pilarinostin; Suuntausnostin; Upotettava nostin; Matalanostin; Keskikorkea nostin; Moottoripyörä-/mönkijänostin; Pysäköinti-/säilytysnostin; Siirrettävä nostin; Saksinostin; 1-pilarinostin; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de cric auto: Elevator cu 2 coloane; Elevator cu 4 coloane; Elevator pentru direcție; Elevator îngropat; Elevator cu ridicare joasă; Elevator cu ridicare medie; Elevator pentru motociclete / ATV-uri; Elevator de parcare / depozitare; Elevator portabil; Elevator tip foarfecă; Elevator cu 1 coloană; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta dizalice vozila: Dizalica s dva stupa; Dizalica s četiri stupa; Dizalica za geometriju kotača; Podna dizalica; Dizalica niskog hoda; Dizalica srednjeg hoda; Dizalica za motocikle/ATV; Dizalica za parkiranje/skladištenje; Prijenosna dizalica; Škarasta dizalica; Dizalica s jednim stupom; Ostalo